Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-146.01
Sections; applicability.

(1) Sections 43-106.02, 43-121, 43-123.01, and 43-146.02 to 43-146.16 shall provide the procedures for gaining access to information concerning an adopted person when a relinquishment or consent for an adoption is given on or after September 1, 1988.

(2) Sections 43-119 to 43-142 shall remain in effect for a relinquishment or consent for an adoption which is given prior to September 1, 1988.

(3) Except as otherwise provided in the Nebraska Indian Child Welfare Act, subsection (2) of section 43-107, and subsection (4) of this section: Sections 43-101 to 43-118, 43-143 to 43-146, 43-146.17, 71-626, 71-626.01, and 71-627.02 shall apply to all adoptions.

(4) Sections 43-143 to 43-146 shall not apply to adopted persons for whom a relinquishment or consent for adoption was given on and after July 20, 2002.

Laws 1988, LB 372, § 6;

Laws 1988, LB 301, § 9;

Laws 2002, LB 952, § 4;

Laws 2011, LB94, § 3;

Laws 2012, LB768, § 3;

Laws 2022, LB741, § 30;

Laws 2026, LB1032, § 10.
July 18, 2026
Nebraska Indian Child Welfare Act, see section 43-1501.